Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.187

Posting of complaint process—Designated point of contact.

Each charter school shall prominently post and maintain on its website information about the school's process and instructions for submitting complaints about the operation and administration of the charter school by its enrolled students and their parents. This information must include a designated point of contact at the charter school and a link to the complaint system of the commission that is required by RCW 28A.710.185.

[ 2023 c 356 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 356: See note following RCW 28A.710.030.